Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1507
Actuarial reports; statement of actuarial assumptions and methods; actuarial valuations and experience investigations; prepared; actuary; certified by Public Employees Retirement Board.

All actuarial reports, statements of actuarial assumptions and methods, and actuarial valuations and experience investigations required for any retirement system in Nebraska covering employees of any political subdivision in the state and supported, in whole or in part, by Nebraska tax dollars shall be prepared and signed by an actuary certified as qualified by the Public Employees Retirement Board. Such certification may be applied for by written request to the Public Employees Retirement Board.

Laws 1973, LB 297, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1974, § 84-1315.01.